fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-micisow_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - mîciso - ok : # Ordinary VAI verb "eat" -  Wolvengrey p. 396; Fut+Def from Okimāsis p. 36

     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: nimîcison
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: kimîcison
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: mîcisow
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: mîcisoyiwa
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: nimîcisonân
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+21Pl: [kimîcisonaw, kimîcisonânaw]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: kimîcisonâwâw
     mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: mîcisowak

     PV/kî+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: [nikî-mîcison]
     PV/kî+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: [kikî-mîcison]
     PV/kî+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: [kî-mîcisow]
     PV/kî+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: [kî-mîcisoyiwa]
     PV/kî+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: [nikî-mîcisonân]
     PV/kî+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+21Pl: [kikî-mîcisonaw, kikî-mîcisonânaw]
     PV/kî+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: [kikî-mîcisonâwâw]
     PV/kî+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: [kî-mîcisowak]
     
     PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: [nika-mîcison]
     PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: [kika-mîcison]
     PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: [ka-mîcisow]
     PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: [ka-mîcisoyiwa]
     PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: [nika-mîcisonân]
     PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+21Pl: [kika-mîcisonaw, kika-mîcisonânaw]
     PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: [kika-mîcisonâwâw]
     PV/ka+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: [ka-mîcisowak]
     
     PV/wî+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Sg: [niwî-mîcison]
     PV/wî+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Sg: [kiwî-mîcison]
     PV/wî+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Sg: [wî-mîcisow]
     PV/wî+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: [wî-mîcisoyiwa]
     PV/wî+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+1Pl: [niwî-mîcisonân]
     PV/wî+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+21Pl: [kiwî-mîcisonaw, kiwî-mîcisonânaw]
     PV/wî+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+2Pl: [kiwî-mîcisonâwâw]
     PV/wî+mîcisow+V+AI+Ind+3Pl: [wî-mîcisowak]
     
     PV/ê+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: [ê-mîcisoyân]
     PV/ê+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [ê-mîcisoyan]
     PV/ê+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: [ê-mîcisot]
     PV/ê+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: [ê-mîcisoyit]
     PV/ê+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: [ê-mîcisoyâhk]
     PV/ê+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+21Pl: [ê-mîcisoyahk]
     PV/ê+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: [ê-mîcisoyêk]
     PV/ê+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [ê-mîcisocik]
     
     PV/ê+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: [ê-mîcisoyân]
     PV/ê+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [ê-mîcisoyan]
     PV/ê+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: [ê-mîcisot]
     PV/ê+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: [ê-mîcisoyit]
     PV/ê+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: [ê-mîcisoyâhk]
     PV/ê+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+21Pl: [ê-mîcisoyahk]
     PV/ê+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: [ê-mîcisoyêk]
     PV/ê+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [ê-mîcisocik]
         
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: [ê-kî-mîcisoyân]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [ê-kî-mîcisoyan]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: [ê-kî-mîcisot]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: [ê-kî-mîcisoyit]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: [ê-kî-mîcisoyâhk]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+21Pl: [ê-kî-mîcisoyahk]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: [ê-kî-mîcisoyêk]
     PV/ê+PV/kî+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [ê-kî-mîcisocik]
     
     PV/ê+PV/wî+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg: [ê-wî-mîcisoyân]
     PV/ê+PV/wî+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg: [ê-wî-mîcisoyan]
     PV/ê+PV/wî+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg: [ê-wî-mîcisot]
     PV/ê+PV/wî+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: [ê-wî-mîcisoyit]
     PV/ê+PV/wî+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl: [ê-wî-mîcisoyâhk]
     PV/ê+PV/wî+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+21Pl: [ê-wî-mîcisoyahk]
     PV/ê+PV/wî+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl: [ê-wî-mîcisoyêk]
     PV/ê+PV/wî+mîcisow+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl: [ê-wî-mîcisocik]
    
    
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-mîcisômâw] # COM SET I
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcisômâw]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-wîci-mîcisômânân]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcisômânaw]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcisômâwâw]
     
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-mîcisômâwak] # COM SET I-Pl
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcisômâwak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-wîci-mîcisômânânak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcisômânawak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcisômâwâwak]

     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcisômin] # COM SET II
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcisôminân]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcisôminâwâw]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcisôminân]


     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-mîcisômêw] # COM SET III
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-mîcisômêwak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-mîcisômêyiwa]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-mîcisômimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîci-mîcisômimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-mîcisômimâwa] # COM SET IV
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcisômimâwa]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîci-mîcisômimânâna]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcisômimânawa]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+mîcisow+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîci-mîcisômimâwâwa]
    
     
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cond+1Sg: mîcisoyâni
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cond+2Sg: mîcisoyani
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cond+3Sg: mîcisoci
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cond+4Sg/Pl: mîcisoyici
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cond+1Pl: mîcisoyâhki
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cond+21Pl: [mîcisoyahko, mîcisoyahki]
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cond+2Pl: mîcisoyêko
     mîcisow+V+AI+Cond+3Pl: mîcisotwâwi
     
     


     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg: mîciso
     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+21Pl: mîcisotân
     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl: mîcisok
     
     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Sg: mîcisohkan
     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Del+21Pl: mîcisohkahk
     mîcisow+V+AI+Imp+Del+2Pl: mîcisohkêk
